Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6910
Health-status-related factor, defined.

Health-status-related factor means any of the following factors:

(1) Health status;

(2) Medical condition, including both physical and mental illnesses;

(3) Claims experience;

(4) Receipt of health care;

(5) Medical history;

(6) Genetic information;

(7) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence; and

(8) Disability.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 10.